Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
PROCUREMENT ORGANIZATION

§103F-301 Powers and duties of the
administrator. The administrator of the state procurement office shall
carry out the following duties:

(1) Assist, advise, and guide state agencies in
matters relating to planning and purchasing health and human services;

(2) Establish and maintain a central health and human
services contracts database;

(3) Develop and administer a statewide orientation
and training program for purchasing agency employees, provider organization employees,
and all other interested parties on all matters relating to carrying out the
purposes of this chapter;

(4) Develop, distribute, and maintain a health and
human service procurement manual for all state procurement officials;

(5) Develop, distribute, and maintain a procurement
guide for health and human service vendors wishing to do business with the
State;

(6) Perform periodic review of the procurement
practices of all governmental bodies which purchase health and human services;

(7) Contract for such services as may be necessary
for the purposes of this chapter; and

(8) Establish and fill such positions as may be
necessary to carry out the functions of this chapter, without regard to
chapters 76 and 89. [L 1997, c 190, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 148, §10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next